test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-nusjTS_gt-norm.yaml
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Sg+Acc+PxDu3: нунамди’
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Sg+Gen+PxDu3: нунанди’
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Sg+Dat+PxDu3: нунаханди’
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Sg+Loc+PxDu3: нунахананди’
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Sg+Abl+PxDu3: нунахаданди’
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Sg+Pros+PxDu3: нунавнанди’
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Du+Nom+PxDu3: нунахаюди’
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Du+Acc+PxDu3: нунахаюди’
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Du+Gen+PxDu3: нунахаюти’
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Pl+Nom+PxDu3: нуниди’
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Pl+Acc+PxDu3: нуниди’
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Pl+Gen+PxDu3: нунити’
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Pl+Dat+PxDu3: нунахати’
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Pl+Loc+PxDu3: нунаха”нати’
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Pl+Abl+PxDu3: [нунахатати’, нунахатти’]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Pl+Pros+PxDu3: нуни”манати’
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: нунава”
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: нунава”
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: нунана”
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: нунахана”
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: нунаханана”
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: [нунахадана”, нунахадна”]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Sg+Pros+PxPl1: нунавнана”
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Du+Nom+PxPl1: нунахаюна”
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Du+Acc+PxPl1: нунахаюна”
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Du+Gen+PxPl1: нунахаюна”
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: нунина”
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: нунина”
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: нуни”на”
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: нунаха”на”
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: нунаха”нана”
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: [нунахатана”, нунахатна”]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Pl+Pros+PxPl1: нуни”манана”
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: нунара”
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: нунамда”
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: нунанда”
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: нунаханда”
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: нунахананда”
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: нунахаданда”
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Sg+Pros+PxPl2: нунавнанда”
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Du+Nom+PxPl2: нунахаюда”
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Du+Acc+PxPl2: нунахаюда”
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Du+Gen+PxPl2: нунахаюта”
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: нунида”
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: нунида”
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: нунита”
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: нунахата”
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: нунаха”ната”
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: [нунахатата”, нунахатта”]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Pl+Pros+PxPl2: нуни”маната”
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: нунадо’
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: нунамдо’
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: нунандо’
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: нунахандо’
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: нунаханандо’
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: нунахадандо’
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Sg+Pros+PxPl3: нунавнандо’
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Du+Nom+PxPl3: нунахаюдо’
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Du+Acc+PxPl3: нунахаюдо’
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Du+Gen+PxPl3: нунахаюто’
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: нунидо’
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: нунидо’
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: нунито’
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: нунахато’
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: нунаха”нато’
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: [нунахатато’, нунахатто’]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Pl+Pros+PxPl3: нуни”манато’
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Pred+Abs: нунад
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Pred+Nom+PxSg1: [нунадав, нунадув, нунадами]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Pred+Acc+PxSg1: [нунадав, нунадув, нунадами]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Pred+Gen+PxSg1: [нунадан, нунадани]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Pred+Nom+PxSg2: нунадар
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Pred+Acc+PxSg2: нунадамд
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Pred+Gen+PxSg2: нунаданд
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Pred+Nom+PxSg3: нунадада
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Pred+Acc+PxSg3: нунадамда
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Pred+Gen+PxSg3: нунаданда
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Pred+Nom+PxDu1: нунадами’
#     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Pred+Nom+PxSg1.2: нунадами
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Pred+Acc+PxDu1: нунадами’
#     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Pred+Acc+PxSg1.2: нунадами
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Pred+Gen+PxDu1: нунадани’
#     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Pred+Gen+PxSg1.2: нунадани
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Pred+Nom+PxDu2: нунадари’
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Pred+Acc+PxDu2: нунадамди’
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Pred+Gen+PxDu2: нунаданди’
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Pred+Nom+PxDu3: нунадади’
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Pred+Acc+PxDu3: нунадамди’
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Pred+Gen+PxDu3: нунаданди’
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Pred+Nom+PxPl1: нунадава”
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Pred+Acc+PxPl1: нунадава”
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Pred+Gen+PxPl1: нунадана”
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Pred+Nom+PxPl2: нунадара”
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Pred+Acc+PxPl2: нунадамда”
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Pred+Gen+PxPl2: нунаданда”
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Pred+Nom+PxPl3: нунададо’
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Pred+Acc+PxPl3: нунадамдо’
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Pred+Gen+PxPl3: нунадандо’
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Abs+Aor+ScSg1: нунадм’
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Abs+Aor+ScSg2: нунан
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Abs+Aor+ScSg3: нуна
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Abs+Aor+ScDu1: нунани’
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Abs+Aor+ScDu2: нунади’
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Abs+Aor+ScDu3: нунаха’
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Abs+Aor+ScPl1: нунава”
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Abs+Aor+ScPl2: нунада”
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Abs+Aor+ScPl3: нуна”
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Abs+Prt1+ScSg1: нунадамзь
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Abs+Prt1+ScSg2: нунанась
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Abs+Prt1+ScSg3: нунась
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Abs+Prt1+ScDu1: нунанинзь
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Abs+Prt1+ScDu2: нунадинзь
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Abs+Prt1+ScDu3: нунаханзь
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Abs+Prt1+ScPl1: нунаваць
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Abs+Prt1+ScPl2: нунадаць
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Abs+Prt1+ScPl3: нунаць
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Sg+Aor+PxSg1: нунав
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Sg+Aor+PxSg2: нунар
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Sg+Aor+PxSg3: нунада
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Sg+Aor+PxDu1: нунами’
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Sg+Aor+PxDu2: нунари’
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Sg+Aor+PxDu3: нунади’
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Sg+Aor+PxPl1: нунава”
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Sg+Aor+PxPl2: нунара”
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Sg+Aor+PxPl3: нунадо’
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Sg+Prt1+PxSg1: нунавась
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Sg+Prt1+PxSg2: нунарась
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Sg+Prt1+PxSg3: нунадась
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Sg+Prt1+PxDu1: нунаминзь
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Sg+Prt1+PxDu2: нунаринзь
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Sg+Prt1+PxDu3: нунадинзь
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Sg+Prt1+PxPl1: нунаваць
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Sg+Prt1+PxPl2: нунараць
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Sg+Prt1+PxPl3: нунадонзь
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Du+Aor+PxSg1: нунахаюн
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Du+Aor+PxSg2: нунахаюд
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Du+Aor+PxSg3: нунахаюда
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Du+Aor+PxDu1: нунахаюни’
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Du+Aor+PxDu2: нунахаюди’
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Du+Aor+PxDu3: нунахаюди’
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Du+Aor+PxPl1: нунахаюна”
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Du+Aor+PxPl2: нунахаюда”
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Du+Aor+PxPl3: нунахаюдо’
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Du+Prt1+PxSg1: нунахаюнась
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Du+Prt1+PxSg2: нунахаюдась
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Du+Prt1+PxSg3: нунахаюдась
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Du+Prt1+PxDu1: нунахаюнинзь
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Du+Prt1+PxDu2: нунахаюдинзь
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Du+Prt1+PxDu3: нунахаюдинзь
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Du+Prt1+PxPl1: нунахаюнаць
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Du+Prt1+PxPl2: нунахаюдаць
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Du+Prt1+PxPl3: нунахаюдонзь
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Pl+Aor+PxSg1: нунин
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Pl+Aor+PxSg2: нунид
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Pl+Aor+PxSg3: нунида
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Pl+Aor+PxDu1: нунини’
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Pl+Aor+PxDu2: нуниди’
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Pl+Aor+PxDu3: нуниди’
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Pl+Aor+PxPl1: нунина”
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Pl+Aor+PxPl2: нунида”
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Pl+Aor+PxPl3: нунидо’
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Pl+Prt1+PxSg1: нунинась
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Pl+Prt1+PxSg2: нунидась
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Pl+Prt1+PxSg3: нунидась
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Pl+Prt1+PxDu1: нунининзь
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Pl+Prt1+PxDu2: нунидинзь
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Pl+Prt1+PxDu3: нунидинзь
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Pl+Prt1+PxPl1: нунинаць
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Pl+Prt1+PxPl2: нунидаць
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Pl+Prt1+PxPl3: нунидонзь
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Tra: нунаӈэ
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Car: нунаси”
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Equ: нунадарем’
     нусь+V+IV+PrcImprf+Equ+lat: нунадарев’
     нусь+V+IV+PrcPrf+Nom+Sg+Abs: нувы
     нусь+V+IV+PrcPrf+Acc+Sg+Abs: нувым’
     нусь+V+IV+PrcPrf+Gen+Sg+Abs: нувы’
     нусь+V+IV+PrcPrf+Dat+Sg+Abs: нувэн’
     нусь+V+IV+PrcPrf+Loc+Sg+Abs: нувэхэна
     нусь+V+IV+PrcPrf+Abl+Sg+Abs: нувэхэд
     нусь+V+IV+PrcPrf+Pros+Sg+Abs: нувэвна
     нусь+V+IV+PrcPrf+Nom+Du+Abs: нувэхэ’
     нусь+V+IV+PrcPrf+Acc+Du+Abs: нувэхэ’
     нусь+V+IV+PrcPrf+Gen+Du+Abs: нувэхэ’
     нусь+V+IV+PrcPrf+Nom+Pl+Abs: нувы”
     нусь+V+IV+PrcPrf+Acc+Pl+Abs: нувы
     нусь+V+IV+PrcPrf+Gen+Pl+Abs: нувы”
     нусь+V+IV+PrcPrf+Dat+Pl+Abs: нувэхэ”
     нусь+V+IV+PrcPrf+Loc+Pl+Abs: нувэхэ”на
     нусь+V+IV+PrcPrf+Abl+Pl+Abs: нувэхэт
     нусь+V+IV+PrcPrf+Pros+Pl+Abs: нувы”мана
     нусь+V+IV+PrcPrf+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: [нувэв, нувэми]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcPrf+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: [нувэв, нувэми]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcPrf+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: [нувэн, нувэни]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcPrf+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: [нувэхэн, нувэхэни]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcPrf+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: [нувэхэнан, нувэхэнани]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcPrf+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: [нувэхэдан, нувэхэдани, нувэхэдни]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcPrf+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: [нувэвнан, нувэвнани]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcPrf+Du+Nom+PxSg1: [нувэхэюн, нувэхэюни]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcPrf+Du+Acc+PxSg1: [нувэхэюн, нувэхэюни]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcPrf+Du+Gen+PxSg1: [нувэхэюн, нувэхэюни]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcPrf+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: [нувын, нувыни]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcPrf+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: [нувын, нувыни]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcPrf+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: [нувы”н, нувы”ни]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcPrf+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: [нувэхэ”н, нувэхэ”ни]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcPrf+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: [нувэхэ”нан, нувэхэ”нани]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcPrf+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: [нувэхэтан, нувэхэтани, нувэхэтни]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcPrf+Pl+Pros+PxSg1: [нувы”манан, нувы”манани]
     нусь+V+IV+PrcPrf+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: нувэр
     нусь+V+IV+PrcPrf+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: нувэмд
     нусь+V+IV+PrcPrf+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: нувэнд
     нусь+V+IV+PrcPrf+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: нувэхэнд
     нусь+V+IV+PrcPrf+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: нувэхэнанд
     нусь+V+IV+PrcPrf+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: нувэхэданд
     нусь+V+IV+PrcPrf+Sg+Pros+PxSg2: нувэвнанд
     нусь+V+IV+PrcPrf+Du+Nom+PxSg2: нувэхэюд
     нусь+V+IV+PrcPrf+Du+Acc+PxSg2: нувэхэюд
     нусь+V+IV+PrcPrf+Du+Gen+PxSg2: нувэхэют
     нусь+V+IV+PrcPrf+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: нувыд
     нусь+V+IV+PrcPrf+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: нувыд
     нусь+V+IV+PrcPrf+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: нувыт
     нусь+V+IV+PrcPrf+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: нувэхэт
     нусь+V+IV+PrcPrf+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: нувэхэ”нат
     нусь+V+IV+PrcPrf+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: нувэхэтат
     нусь+V+IV+PrcPrf+Pl+Pros+PxSg2: нувы”манат
     нусь+V+IV+PrcPrf+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: нувэда
     нусь+V+IV+PrcPrf+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: нувэмда
     нусь+V+IV+PrcPrf+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: нувэнда
     нусь+V+IV+PrcPrf+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: нувэхэнда
     нусь+V+IV+PrcPrf+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: нувэхэнанда
     нусь+V+IV+PrcPrf+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: нувэхэданда
     нусь+V+IV+PrcPrf+Sg+Pros+PxSg3: нувэвнанда
     нусь+V+IV+PrcPrf+Du+Nom+PxSg3: нувэхэюда
     нусь+V+IV+PrcPrf+Du+Acc+PxSg3: нувэхэюда
     нусь+V+IV+PrcPrf+Du+Gen+PxSg3: нувэхэюта
     нусь+V+IV+PrcPrf+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: нувыда
